Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1271
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of sections 37-1241.02 to 37-1241.05, 37-1241.07, 37-1251, 37-1252, or 37-1258 to 37-1261 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for each violation.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 71;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 125.